Utah statutes.
41-6a-509.   Driver license suspension or revocation for a driving under the
influence violation.
(1) (a)  The Driver License Division shall:
(i)  if the person is 21 years of age or older at the time of arrest:
(A)  suspend for a period of 120 days the operator's license of a person
convicted for the first time under Section 41-6a-502 of an offense committed
on or after July 1, 2009; and
(B)  revoke for a period of two years the license of a person if:
(I)  the person has a prior conviction as defined under Subsection
41-6a-501(2); and
(II)  the current driving under the influence violation under Section
41-6a-502 is committed:
(Aa)  within a period of ten years from the date of the prior violation; and
(Bb)  on or after July 1, 2009;
(ii)  if the person is under 21 years of age at the time of arrest:
(A)  suspend the person's driver license until the person is 21 years of age
or for a period of 120 days, whichever is longer, if the person is convicted
for the first time of a driving under the influence violation under Section
41-6a-502 of an offense that was committed on or after July 1, 2009;
(B)  deny the person's application for a license or learner's permit until the
person is 21 years of age or for a period of 120 days, whichever is longer, if
the person:
(I)  is convicted for the first time of a driving under the influence
violation under Section 41-6a-502 of an offense committed on or after July 1,
2009; and
(II)  has not been issued an operator license;
(C)  revoke the person's driver license until the person is 21 years of age or
for a period of two years, whichever is longer, if:
(I)  the person has a prior conviction as defined under Subsection
41-6a-501(2); and
(II)  the current driving under the influence violation under Section
41-6a-502 is committed:
(Aa)  within a period of ten years from the date of the prior violation; and
(Bb)  on or after July 1, 2009; or
(D)  deny the person's application for a license or learner's permit until the
person is 21 years of age or for a period of two years, whichever is longer,
if:
(I)  the person has a prior conviction as defined under Subsection
41-6a-501(2);
(II)  the current driving under the influence violation under Section
41-6a-502 is committed:
(Aa)  within a period of ten years from the date of the prior violation; and
(Bb)  on or after July 1, 2009; and
(III)  the person has not been issued an operator license; and
(iii)  suspend or revoke the license of a person as ordered by the court under
Subsection (2).
(b)  The Driver License Division shall suspend the operator's license of a
person convicted under Section 41-6a-502 of an offense that was committed
prior to July 1, 2009, for the suspension periods in effect prior to July 1,
2009.
(c)  The Driver License Division shall subtract from any suspension or
revocation period the number of days for which a license was previously
suspended under Section 53-3-223 or 53-3-231, if the previous suspension was
based on the same occurrence upon which the record of conviction is based.
(d)  If a conviction recorded as impaired driving is amended to a driving
under the influence conviction under Section 41-6a-502 in accordance with
Subsection 41-6a-502.5(3)(a)(ii), the Driver License Division:
(i)  may not subtract from any suspension or revocation any time for which a
license was previously suspended or revoked under Section 53-3-223 or
53-3-231; and
(ii)  shall start the suspension or revocation time under Subsection (1)(a) on
the date of the amended conviction.
(2) (a) (i)  In addition to any other penalties provided in this section, a
court may order the operator's license of a person who is convicted of a
violation of Section 41-6a-502 to be suspended or revoked for an additional
period of 90 days, 180 days, one year, or two years to remove from the
highways those persons who have shown they are safety hazards.
(ii)  The additional suspension or revocation period provided in this
Subsection (2) shall begin the date on which the individual would be eligible
to reinstate the individual's driving privilege for a violation of Section
41-6a-502.
(b)  If the court suspends or revokes the person's license under this
Subsection (2), the court shall prepare and send to the Driver License
Division an order to suspend or revoke that person's driving privileges for a
specified period of time.
(3) (a)  The court shall notify the Driver License Division if a person fails
to:
(i)  complete all court ordered:
(A)  screening;
(B)  assessment;
(C)  educational series;
(D)  substance abuse treatment; and
(E)  hours of work in a compensatory-service work program; or
(ii)  pay all fines and fees, including fees for restitution and treatment
costs.
(b)  Upon receiving the notification described in Subsection (3)(a), the
division shall suspend the person's driving privilege in accordance with
Subsections 53-3-221(2) and (3).
